el: Τύπος εργαλείου καθαρισμού ορείχαλκου: Πανί καθαρισμού; Ράβδος καθαρισμού; Μάκτρο καθαρισμού; Εύκαμπτο εργαλείο καθαρισμού αυλού (bore snake); Βουρτσάκι σωλήνα; Βουρτσάκι επιστομίου; Σφουγγάρι γυαλίσματος; Κορδόνι περιστροφικής βαλβίδας; Σφουγγάρι τριψίματος; Βουρτσάκι ολισθητήρα; Βουρτσάκι βαλβίδας (έμβολο); Βουρτσάκι περιβλήματος βαλβίδας; Βουρτσάκι κλειδιού νερού (βαλβίδα υγρών); Άλλο
pt-BR: Ferramenta de limpeza para latão: Pano de limpeza; Vareta de limpeza; Swab de limpeza; Cabo de limpeza flexível (bore snake); Escova para tudel; Escova para bocal; Disco de polimento; Cordão para válvula rotativa; Esponja abrasiva; Escova para vara; Escova para válvula (pistão); Escova para caixa de válvula; Escova para chave de água (válvula de saliva); Outro
en: Brass cleaning tool type: Cleaning cloth; Cleaning rod; Cleaning swab; Flexible bore snake; Leadpipe brush; Mouthpiece brush; Polishing pad; Rotary valve string; Scrub sponge; Slide brush; Valve brush (piston); Valve casing brush; Water key (spit valve) brush; Other
tr: Pirinç üflemeli çalgı temizleme aracı tipi: Temizleme bezi; Temizleme çubuğu; İç temizleme bezi; Esnek temizleme kordonu; Ağızlık borusu fırçası; Ağızlık fırçası; Parlatma pedi; Rotor supap ipi; Ovma süngeri; Sürgü fırçası; Supap fırçası (piston); Piston yuvası fırçası; Su anahtarı (tükürük valfi) fırçası; Diğer
ro-RO: Tip de instrument de curățare a alamei: Lavetă de curățare; Tijă de curățare; Tampon de curățare; Șnur de curățare flexibil; Perie pentru tubul principal; Perie pentru muștiuc; Burete de lustruit; Sfoară pentru supapă rotativă; Burete abraziv; Perie pentru culisă; Perie pentru valve (piston); Perie pentru carcasa valvelor; Perie pentru supapa de apă; Altele
da: Type af værktøj til rensning af messing: Renseklud; Rensestok; Rensepind; Fleksibel rensesnor (bore snake); Mundrørsbørste; Mundstykkebørste; Poleringspude; Roterventilsnor; Skuresvamp; Trækbørste; Ventilbørste (piston); Ventilhusbørste; Vandklapbørste (spytventil); Andet
fi: Vaskipuhdistustyökalun tyyppi: Puhdistusliina; Puhdistuspuikko; Puhdistustuppo; Joustava puhdistusvaijeri; Suuputken harja; Suukappaleen harja; Kiillotustyyny; Roottoriventtiilin lanka; Puhdistussieni; Vetoputken harja; Venttiiliharja (mäntä); Venttiilikotelon harja; Vesiventtiilin harja; Muu
hr-HR: Vrsta alata za čišćenje mesinga: Krpa za čišćenje; Šipka za čišćenje; Bris za čišćenje; Savitljiva užad za čišćenje (bore snake); Četka za usnu cijev; Četka za usnik; Jastučić za poliranje; Uzica za rotacijski ventil; Spužva za ribanje; Četka za povlačak; Četka za ventil (klipni); Četka za kućište ventila; Četka za vodeni ventil (spit valve); Ostalo
th: ประเภทอุปกรณ์ทำความสะอาดเครื่องเป่าทองเหลือง: ผ้าทำความสะอาด; ก้านทำความสะอาด; ไม้กวาดทำความสะอาด; แส้ล้างท่อแบบยืดหยุ่น; แปรงทำความสะอาดท่อลม; แปรงทำความสะอาดปากเป่า; แผ่นขัดเงา; เชือกสำหรับโรตารีวาล์ว; ฟองน้ำขัด; แปรงทำความสะอาดสไลด์; แปรงทำความสะอาดวาล์ว (ลูกสูบ); แปรงทำความสะอาดกระบอกวาล์ว; แปรงทำความสะอาดกุญแจน้ำ (วาล์วน้ำลาย); อื่นๆ
hu: Rézfúvós tisztítóeszköz típusa: Tisztítókendő; Tisztítópálca; Tisztítótörlő; Rugalmas tisztítóhúr; Fúvókacső-tisztító kefe; Fúvókatisztító kefe; Polírozópárna; Forgószelep-húr; Súrolószivacs; Tolócsőtisztító kefe; Szeleptisztító kefe (dugattyús); Szelepház-tisztító kefe; Vízbillentyű-tisztító kefe; Egyéb
es: Tipo de herramienta de limpieza de latón: Paño de limpieza; Varilla de limpieza; Hisopo de limpieza; Limpiador flexible; Cepillo para tudel; Cepillo para boquilla; Almohadilla de pulido; Cuerda para válvula rotativa; Esponja de limpieza; Cepillo para vara; Cepillo para válvulas (pistón); Cepillo para camisa de válvula; Cepillo para llave de desagüe (válvula de saliva); Otro
sv: Typ av rengöringsverktyg för mässing: Rengöringsduk; Rengöringsstav; Rengöringssvabb; Flexibel rengöringslina; Munrörsborste; Munstycksborste; Polerdyna; Ventiltråd; Skursvamp; Bygelborste; Ventilborste (pumpventil); Ventilhusborste; Vattenklaffsborste; Övrigt
ko: 금관악기 세척 도구 유형: 청소용 천; 청소용 막대; 청소용 스왑; 유연한 보어 스네이크; 리드파이프 브러시; 마우스피스 브러시; 폴리싱 패드; 로터리 밸브 스트링; 스크럽 스폰지; 슬라이드 브러시; 밸브 브러시(피스톤); 밸브 케이싱 브러시; 워터 키(침 구멍) 브러시; 기타
de: Typ des Reinigungswerkzeugs für Messing: Reinigungstuch; Putzstock; Reinigungswischer; Flexible Reinigungsschnur; Mundrohrbürste; Mundstückbürste; Polierpad; Zylinderventilschnur; Scheuerschwamm; Zugbürste; Ventilbürste (Pumpventil); Ventilgehäusebürste; Wasserklappenbürste; Sonstige
ja: 真鍮製クリーニングツール: クリーニングクロス; クリーニングロッド; クリーニングスワブ; フレキシブルボアスネーク; リードパイプブラシ; マウスピースブラシ; ポリッシングパッド; ロータリーストリング; スクラブスポンジ; スライドブラシ; バルブブラシ (ピストン用); バルブケーシングブラシ; ウォーターキイブラシ; その他
sl-SI: Vrsta orodja za čiščenje trobil: Krpa za čiščenje; Čistilna palica; Čistilna palčka; Gibljiva vrvica za čiščenje; Čopič za vodilno cev; Čopič za ustnik; Blazinica za poliranje; Vrvica za rotacijski ventil; Goba za čiščenje; Čopič za poteg; Čopič za ventile (batne); Čopič za ohišje ventilov; Čopič za vodni ključ; Drugo
vi: Loại dụng cụ làm sạch đồ đồng thau: Khăn vệ sinh; Que vệ sinh; Tăm bông vệ sinh; Dây rút vệ sinh nòng; Chổi vệ sinh ống dẫn; Chổi vệ sinh búp kèn; Miếng đánh bóng; Dây van xoay; Miếng bọt biển cọ rửa; Chổi vệ sinh ống trượt; Chổi vệ sinh van (pít-tông); Chổi vệ sinh vỏ van; Chổi vệ sinh van xả nước; Khác
sk-SK: Typ nástroja na čistenie mosadze: Čistiaca handrička; Čistiaca tyčinka; Čistiaci tampón; Flexibilný čistič (bore snake); Štetec na ústnicovú trubicu; Štetec na náustok; Leštiaca podložka; Šnúrka na rotačný ventil; Čistiaca špongia; Štetec na ťahce; Štetec na ventily (piestový); Štetec na puzdro ventilu; Štetec na vodnú klapku; Iné
lt-LT: Žalvario valymo įrankio tipas: Valymo šluostė; Valymo strypas; Valymo tamponas; Lankstus kanalo valiklis; Mundštuko vamzdelio šepetėlis; Mundštuko šepetėlis; Poliravimo pagalvėlė; Rotoriaus vožtuvo styga; Šveitimo kempinė; Slankiklio šepetėlis; Vožtuvo šepetėlis (stūmoklinis); Vožtuvo korpuso šepetėlis; Vandens vožtuvo šepetėlis; Kitas
it: Strumento di pulizia in ottone: Panno per la pulizia; Scovolino rigido; Tampone per la pulizia; Scovolino flessibile (bore snake); Scovolino per cannello; Scovolino per bocchino; Tampone per lucidatura; Corda per valvola rotativa; Spugna abrasiva; Scovolino per coulisse; Scovolino per valvola (pistone); Scovolino per camera della valvola; Scovolino per chiave dell’acqua (valvola di scarico); Altro
zh-TW: 銅管清潔工具類型: 擦拭布; 清潔棒; 清潔通條布; 彈性通條; 吹口管刷; 吹嘴刷; 拋光墊; 轉閥線; 清潔海綿; 滑管刷; 活塞刷; 活塞套管刷; 排水鍵 (口水閥) 刷; 其他
fr: Type d’outil de nettoyage pour cuivres: Chiffon de nettoyage; Tige de nettoyage; Écouvillon de nettoyage; Écouvillon flexible; Écouvillon pour branche d'embouchure; Écouvillon pour embouchure; Tampon à polir; Ficelle de palette; Éponge à récurer; Écouvillon pour coulisse; Écouvillon pour piston; Écouvillon pour chambre de piston; Écouvillon pour clé d'eau; Autre
cs: Typ čističe na žesťové nástroje: Čisticí hadřík; Čisticí tyčka; Čisticí vytěrák; Flexibilní vytěrák; Kartáček na ústnici; Kartáček na nátrubek; Lešticí polštářek; Šňůrka k rotačnímu ventilu; Čisticí houbička; Kartáček na tahy; Kartáček na ventily (pístové); Kartáček na pouzdro ventilu; Kartáček na vodní klapku; Jiné
bg-BG: Тип инструмент за почистване на месинг: Кърпа за почистване; Шомпол за почистване; Тампон за почистване; Гъвкав шомпол тип змия; Четка за мундщукова тръба; Четка за мундщук; Подложка за полиране; Връв за ротационен вентил; Гъба за търкане; Четка за цуг; Четка за вентил (бутален); Четка за вентилна кутия; Четка за водна клапа; Други
pl: Typ narzędzia do czyszczenia instrumentów blaszanych: Ściereczka do czyszczenia; Wycior; Przecierka do czyszczenia; Elastyczny wycior sznurkowy; Szczotka do rurki ustnikowej; Szczotka do ustnika; Podkładka polerska; Sznurek do wentyli obrotowych; Gąbka do szorowania; Szczotka do suwaka; Szczotka do wentyli (tłokowych); Szczotka do komory wentyla; Szczotka do klapy wodnej; Inne
nb: Type rengjøringsverktøy for messing: Pusseklut; Pussestokk; Rensepinne; Fleksibel pussesnor; Munnrørsbørste; Munnstykkebørste; Poleringspute; Sylinderstreng; Skrubbesvamp; Sleidebørste; Ventilbørste (stempel); Ventilhusbørste; Børste for vannklaff (spytteventil); Annet
nl: Type reinigingsgereedschap voor koperblazers: Reinigingsdoek; Wisserstok; Wisser; Flexibele wisser; Mondpijpborstel; Mondstukborstel; Polijstpad; Cilinderkoord; Schuurspons; Schuifborstel; Ventielborstel (piston); Ventielhuisborstel; Waterklepborstel (spuugklep); Overig
zh-CN: 铜管乐器清洁工具类型: 清洁布; 清洁通条; 清洁拭子; 柔性通条; 吹管刷; 号嘴刷; 抛光垫; 转阀绳; 擦洗海绵; 滑管刷; 活塞刷; 活塞套刷; 排水键（放水阀）刷; 其他
ru: Тип инструмента для чистки латуни: Салфетка для чистки; Шомпол; Тампон для чистки (пуховка); Гибкий ерш (bore snake); Ершик для мундштучной трубки; Ершик для мундштука; Полировальная подушечка; Нить для роторного вентиля; Губка для чистки; Ершик для кулисы; Ершик для помпы; Ершик для корпуса помпы; Ершик для клапана слива конденсата; Другое
pt-PT: Tipo de ferramenta de limpeza de latão: Pano de limpeza; Vareta de limpeza; Esfregão de limpeza; Escova flexível para tubo; Escova para tubo de embocadura; Escova para bocal; Almofada de polimento; Fio de cilindro; Esponja abrasiva; Escova para vara; Escova para válvula (pistão); Escova para camisa de válvula; Escova para chave de água (válvula de saliva); Outro